Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.040

Criminal impersonation in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the first degree if the person:

(a) Assumes a false identity and does an act in his or her assumed character with intent to defraud another or for any other unlawful purpose; or

(b) Pretends to be a representative of some person or organization or a public servant and does an act in his or her pretended capacity with intent to defraud another or for any other unlawful purpose.

(2) Criminal impersonation in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2004 c 11 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 78; 1993 c 457 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.60.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 11: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 11 s 3.]

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.